Missouri, session 2026, HB3428.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Sections 32.383, 142.031, 143.1009, 143.1013, 143.1017, 143.1026,
143.1027, 161.1055, 260.920, 303.406, 620.2100, and 650.550, RSMo, are repealed and
twelve new sections enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as sections 32.383, 142.031,
143.1009, 143.1013, 143.1017, 143.1026, 143.1027, 161.1055, 260.920, 303.406, 620.2100,
and 650.550, to read as follows:
32.383. 1. Notwithstanding the provisions of any other law to the contrary, with
respect to taxes administered by the department of revenue under this chapter and chapters
143, 144, and 147, an amnesty from the assessment or payment of all penalties, additions to
tax, and interest shall apply with respect to unpaid taxes or taxes due and owing reported and
paid in full from September 1, 2015, to November 30, 2015, regardless of whether previously
assessed, except for penalties, additions to tax, and interest paid before September 1, 2015.
The amnesty shall apply only to tax liabilities due or due but unpaid on or before December
31, 2014, and shall not extend to any taxpayer who at the time of payment is a party to any
criminal investigations or to any civil or criminal litigation that is pending in any court of the
United States or this state for nonpayment, delinquency, or fraud in relation to any state tax
imposed by this state.
2. Upon written application by the taxpayer, on forms prescribed by the director of
revenue, and upon compliance with the provisions of this section, the department of revenue
shall not seek to collect any penalty, addition to tax, or interest that may be applicable. The
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HCS HB 3428 2
department of revenue shall not seek civil or criminal prosecution for any taxpayer for the
taxable period for which the amnesty has been granted unless subsequent investigation or
audit shows that the taxpayer engaged in fraudulent or criminal conduct in applying for
amnesty.
3. Amnesty shall be granted only to those taxpayers who have applied for amnesty
within the period stated in this section, who have filed a tax return for each taxable period for
which amnesty is requested, who have paid the entire balance by November 30, 2015, and
who agree to comply with state tax laws for the next eight years from the date of the
agreement. No taxpayer shall be entitled to a waiver of any penalty, addition to tax, or
interest under this section unless full payment of the tax due is made in accordance with rules
established by the director of revenue.
4. All taxpayers granted amnesty under this section shall in good faith comply with
this state's tax laws for the eight years following the date of the amnesty agreement. If any
such taxpayer fails to comply with all of this state's tax laws at any time during the eight years
following the date of the agreement, all penalties, additions to tax, and interest that were
waived under the amnesty agreement shall become due and owing immediately.
5. If a taxpayer is granted amnesty under this section, such taxpayer shall not be
eligible to participate in any future amnesty for the same type of tax.
6. If a taxpayer elects to participate in the amnesty program established in this section
as evidenced by full payment of the tax due as established by the director of revenue, that
election shall constitute an express and absolute relinquishment of all administrative and
judicial rights of appeal. No tax payment received under this section shall be eligible for
refund or credit.
7. Nothing in this section shall be interpreted to disallow the department of revenue to
adjust a taxpayer's tax return as a result of any state or federal audit.
8. All tax payments received as a result of the amnesty program established in this
section, other than revenues earmarked by the Constitution of Missouri, this state's statutes, or
subsection 9 of this section, shall be deposited in the tax amnesty fund created in subsection 9
of this section. Moneys in the fund shall only be expended for the following except that any
excess moneys not used for such purposes shall be deposited into the state general revenue
fund:
(1) An increase in the rate of reimbursement to MO HealthNet providers for the fiscal
year ending June 30, 2016, above the rate in effect for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2015;
and
(2) An increase in the number of adults receiving dental coverage under MO
HealthNet in the fiscal year ending June 30, 2016, above the number of adults receiving
dental coverage in the fiscal year ending June 30, 2015.

HCS HB 3428 3
9. There is hereby created in the state treasury the "Tax Amnesty Fund", which shall
consist of money collected under this section. The state treasurer shall be custodian of the
fund and may approve disbursements from the fund in accordance with sections 30.170 and
30.180. Upon appropriation, money in the fund shall be used solely for the purpose provided
in subsection 8 of this section. Any moneys remaining in the fund at the end of the biennium
shall revert to the credit of the general revenue fund. The state treasurer shall invest moneys
in the fund in the same manner as other funds are invested. Any interest and moneys earned
on such investments shall be credited to the fund.
10. The department of revenue may enter into an agreement with a third-party vendor
to provide collection services for eligible delinquent tax liabilities that the department has
undertaken to collect under this section, and to assist with the administration of the amnesty
program under which contingency and other fees may be payable to such approved vendor
out of the revenues from the amnesty program.
11. The department may promulgate rules or issue administrative guidelines as are
necessary to implement the provisions of this section. Any rule or portion of a rule, as that
term is defined in section 536.010, that is created under the authority delegated in this section
shall become effective only if it complies with and is subject to all of the provisions of
chapter 536 and, if applicable, section 536.028. This section and chapter 536 are
nonseverable and if any of the powers vested with the general assembly pursuant to chapter
536 to review, to delay the effective date, or to disapprove and annul a rule are subsequently
held unconstitutional, then the grant of rulemaking authority and any rule proposed or
adopted after August 28, 2015, shall be invalid and void.
12. This section shall expire on December 31, 2023.
13. On August 28, 2026, any moneys remaining in the tax amnesty fund created
under subsection 9 of this section shall be credited to the general revenue fund.
142.031. 1. As used in this section the following terms shall mean:
(1) "Biodiesel", fuel as defined in ASTM Standard D-6751 or its subsequent standard
specifications for biodiesel fuel (B100) blend stock for distillate fuels;
(2) "Missouri qualified biodiesel producer", a facility that produces biodiesel, is
registered with the United States Environmental Protection Agency according to the
requirements of 40 CFR 79, and:
(a) a. Is at least fifty-one percent owned by agricultural producers who are residents
of this state and who are actively engaged in agricultural production for commercial purposes;
or
b. At least eighty percent of the feedstock used by the facility originates in the state of
Missouri. For purposes of this section, "feedstock" means an agricultural, horticultural,

HCS HB 3428 4
viticultural, vegetable, aquacultural, livestock, forestry, or poultry product either in its natural
or processed state; and
(b) Meets all of the following:
a. Has registered with the department of agriculture by September 1, 2007;
b. Has begun construction of the facility before November 1, 2007; and
c. Has begun production of biodiesel before March 1, 2009.
2. The "Missouri Qualified Biodiesel Producer Incentive Fund" is hereby created and
subject to appropriations shall be used to provide economic subsidies to Missouri qualified
biodiesel producers pursuant to this section. The director of the department of agriculture
shall administer the fund pursuant to this section.
3. A Missouri qualified biodiesel producer shall be eligible for a monthly grant from
the fund provided that one hundred percent of the feedstock originates in the United States.
However, the director may waive the feedstock requirements on a month-to-month basis if the
facility provides verification that adequate feedstock is not available. A Missouri qualified
biodiesel producer shall only be eligible for the grant for a total of sixty months unless such
producers during the sixty months fail, due to a lack of appropriations, to receive the full
amount from the fund for which the producers were eligible, in which case such producers
shall continue to be eligible until they have received the maximum amount of funding for
which such producers were eligible during the original sixty-month time period. The amount
of the grant is determined by calculating the estimated gallons of qualified biodiesel produced
during the preceding month from feedstock, as certified by the department of agriculture, and
applying such figure to the per-gallon incentive credit established in this subsection. Each
Missouri qualified biodiesel producer shall be eligible for a total grant in any fiscal year equal
to thirty cents per gallon for the first fifteen million gallons of qualified biodiesel produced
from feedstock in the fiscal year plus ten cents per gallon for the next fifteen million gallons
of qualified biodiesel produced from feedstock in the fiscal year. All such qualified biodiesel
produced by a Missouri qualified biodiesel producer in excess of thirty million gallons shall
not be applied to the computation of a grant pursuant to this subsection. The department of
agriculture shall pay all grants for a particular month by the fifteenth day after receipt and
approval of the application described in subsection 4 of this section.
4. In order for a Missouri qualified biodiesel producer to obtain a grant from the fund,
an application for such funds shall be received no later than fifteen days following the last day
of the month for which the grant is sought. The application shall include:
(1) The location of the Missouri qualified biodiesel producer;
(2) The average number of citizens of Missouri employed by the Missouri qualified
biodiesel producer in the preceding month, if applicable;

HCS HB 3428 5
(3) The number of bushel equivalents of Missouri feedstock and out-of-state
feedstock used by the Missouri qualified biodiesel producer in the production of biodiesel in
the preceding month;
(4) The number of gallons of qualified biodiesel the producer manufactures during
the month for which the grant is applied;
(5) A copy of the qualified biodiesel producer license required pursuant to subsection
5 of this section, name and address of surety company, and amount of bond to be posted
pursuant to subsection 5 of this section; and
(6) Any other information deemed necessary by the department of agriculture to
adequately ensure that such grants shall be made only to Missouri qualified biodiesel
producers.
5. The director of the department of agriculture, in consultation with the department
of revenue, shall promulgate rules and regulations necessary for the administration of the
provisions of this section.
6. Any rule or portion of a rule, as that term is defined in section 536.010, that is
created under the authority delegated in this section shall become effective only if it complies
with and is subject to all of the provisions of chapter 536 and, if applicable, section 536.028.
This section and chapter 536 are nonseverable and if any of the powers vested with the
general assembly pursuant to chapter 536 to review, to delay the effective date or to
disapprove and annul a rule are subsequently held unconstitutional, then the grant of
rulemaking authority and any rule proposed or adopted after August 28, 2002, shall be invalid
and void.
7. This section shall expire on December 31, 2009. However, Missouri qualified
biodiesel producers receiving any grants awarded prior to December 31, 2009, shall continue
to be eligible for the remainder of the original sixty-month time period under the same terms
and conditions of this section unless such producer during such sixty months failed, due to a
lack of appropriations, to receive the full amount from the fund for which he or she was
eligible. In such case, such producers shall continue to be eligible until they have received the
maximum amount of funding for which they were eligible during the original sixty-month
time period.
8. Any Missouri qualified biodiesel producer who receives any grant payments under
this section who subsequently sells the biodiesel facility shall be subject to the following
payback requirements:
(1) If such facility is sold within less than one year of the date of issuance of the last
grant payment, the Missouri qualified biodiesel producer shall pay the state the amount of
fifty percent of the total amount of grant payments received under this section;

HCS HB 3428 6
(2) If such facility is sold within one to two years of the date of issuance of the last
grant payment, the Missouri qualified biodiesel producer shall pay the state the amount of
forty percent of the total amount of grant payments received under this section;
(3) If such facility is sold within two to three years of the date of issuance of the last
grant payment, the Missouri qualified biodiesel producer shall pay the state the amount of
thirty percent of the total amount of grant payments received under this section;
(4) If such facility is sold within three to four years of the date of issuance of the last
grant payment, the Missouri qualified biodiesel producer shall pay the state the amount of
twenty percent of the total amount of grant payments received under this section;
(5) If such facility is sold within four to five years of the date of issuance of the last
grant payment, the Missouri qualified biodiesel producer shall pay the state the amount of ten
percent of the total amount of grant payments received under this section.

If the sale date of the facility falls on a date that qualifies under more than one subdivision of
this subsection, the greater payback amount shall apply. For purposes of this subsection, a
facility shall be considered "sold" when there is a change in at least fifty-one percent of the
100 facility's ownership in a transaction that involves a buyer or buyers and a seller or sellers.
101 9. On August 28, 2026, any moneys remaining in the Missouri qualified biodiesel
102 producer incentive fund created under subsection 2 of this section shall be credited to
103 the general revenue fund.
143.1009. 1. In each taxable year beginning on or after January 1, 2008, each
individual or corporation entitled to a tax refund in an amount sufficient to make a
designation under this section may designate that one dollar or any amount in excess of one
dollar on a single return, and two dollars or any amount in excess of two dollars on a
combined return, of the refund due be credited to the breast cancer awareness trust fund,
hereinafter referred to as the trust fund. If any individual or corporation that is not entitled to
a tax refund in an amount sufficient to make a designation under this section wishes to make a
contribution to the trust fund, such individual or corporation may, by separate check, draft, or
other negotiable instrument, send in with the payment of taxes, or may send in separately, that
amount, clearly designated for the breast cancer awareness trust fund, the individual or
corporation wishes to contribute. The department of revenue shall deposit such amount to the
trust fund as provided in subsections 2 and 3 of this section. All moneys credited to the trust
fund shall be considered nonstate funds under the provisions of Article IV, Section 15 of the
Missouri Constitution.
2. The director of revenue shall deposit at least monthly all contributions designated
by individuals under this section to the state treasurer for deposit to the trust fund.

HCS HB 3428 7
3. The director of revenue shall deposit at least monthly all contributions designated
by the corporations under this section, less an amount sufficient to cover the costs of
collection and handling by the department of revenue, to the state treasury for deposit to the
trust fund.
4. A contribution designated under this section shall only be deposited in the trust
fund after all other claims against the refund from which such contribution is to be made have
been satisfied.
5. All moneys transferred to the trust fund shall be distributed by the director of
revenue at times the director deems appropriate to the department of health and senior
services. Such funds shall be used solely for the purpose of providing breast cancer services.
Notwithstanding the provisions of section 33.080 to the contrary, moneys in the trust fund at
the end of any biennium shall not be transferred to the credit of the general revenue fund.
6. There is hereby created in the state treasury the "Breast Cancer Awareness Trust
Fund", which shall consist of money collected under this section. The state treasurer shall be
custodian of the fund. In accordance with sections 30.170 and 30.180, the state treasurer may
approve disbursements.
7. Under section 23.253 of the Missouri sunset act:
(1) The provisions of the new program authorized under this section shall
automatically sunset six years after August 28, 2008, unless reauthorized by an act of the
general assembly; and
(2) If such program is reauthorized, the program authorized under this section shall
automatically sunset twelve years after the effective date of the reauthorization of this section;
and
(3) This section shall terminate on December thirty-first of the calendar year
immediately following the calendar year in which the program authorized under this section
is sunset.
8. On August 28, 2026, any moneys remaining in the breast cancer awareness
trust fund created under subsection 6 of this section shall be credited to the general
revenue fund.
143.1013. 1. For all taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2011, each
individual or corporation entitled to a tax refund in an amount sufficient to make a
designation under this section may designate that one dollar or any amount in excess of one
dollar on a single return, and two dollars or any amount in excess of two dollars on a
combined return, of the refund due be credited to the American Red Cross trust fund. If any
individual or corporation that is not entitled to a tax refund in an amount sufficient to make a
designation under this section wishes to make a contribution to the fund, such individual or
corporation may, by separate check, draft, or other negotiable instrument, send in with the

HCS HB 3428 8
payment of taxes, or may send in separately, that amount the individual or corporation wishes
to contribute. Such amounts shall be clearly designated for the fund.
2. There is hereby created in the state treasury the "American Red Cross Trust Fund",
which shall consist of money collected under this section. The state treasurer shall be
custodian of the fund. In accordance with sections 30.170 and 30.180, the state treasurer may
approve disbursements. The fund shall be a dedicated fund and, upon appropriation, money
in the fund shall be used solely for the administration of this section. Notwithstanding the
provisions of section 33.080 to the contrary, any moneys remaining in the fund at the end of
the biennium shall not revert to the credit of the general revenue fund. The state treasurer
shall invest moneys in the fund in the same manner as other funds are invested. Any interest
and moneys earned on such investments shall be credited to the fund. All moneys credited to
the trust fund shall be considered nonstate funds under Section 15, Article IV, Constitution of
Missouri. The treasurer shall distribute all moneys deposited in the fund at times the treasurer
deems appropriate to the American Red Cross.
3. The director of revenue shall deposit at least monthly all contributions designated
by individuals under this section to the state treasurer for deposit to the fund. The director of
revenue shall deposit at least monthly all contributions designated by the corporations under
this section, less an amount sufficient to cover the costs of collection and handling by the
department of revenue, to the state treasury for deposit to the fund. A contribution designated
under this section shall only be deposited in the fund after all other claims against the refund
from which such contribution is to be made have been satisfied.
4. Under section 23.253 of the Missouri sunset act:
(1) The provisions of the new program authorized under this section shall
automatically sunset on December thirty-first six years after August 28, 2011, unless
reauthorized by an act of the general assembly; and
(2) If such program is reauthorized, the program authorized under this section shall
automatically sunset on December thirty-first twelve years after the effective date of the
reauthorization of this section; and
(3) This section shall terminate on September first of the calendar year immediately
following the calendar year in which the program authorized under this section is sunset.
5. On August 28, 2026, any moneys remaining in the American Red Cross trust
fund created under subsection 2 of this section shall be credited to the general revenue
fund.
143.1017. 1. For all taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2011, each
individual or corporation entitled to a tax refund in an amount sufficient to make a
designation under this section may designate that one dollar or any amount in excess of one
dollar on a single return, and two dollars or any amount in excess of two dollars on a

HCS HB 3428 9
combined return, of the refund due be credited to the developmental disabilities waiting list
equity trust fund. If any individual or corporation that is not entitled to a tax refund in an
amount sufficient to make a designation under this section wishes to make a contribution to
the fund, such individual or corporation may, by separate check, draft, or other negotiable
instrument, send in with the payment of taxes, or may send in separately, that amount the
individual or corporation wishes to contribute. Such amounts shall be clearly designated for
the fund.
2. There is hereby created in the state treasury the "Developmental Disabilities
Waiting List Equity Trust Fund", which shall consist of money collected under this section.
The state treasurer shall be custodian of the fund. In accordance with sections 30.170 and
30.180, the state treasurer may approve disbursements. The fund shall be a dedicated fund
and, upon appropriation, money in the fund shall be used solely for the administration of this
section and for providing community services and support to people with developmental
disabilities and such person's families who are on the developmental disabilities waiting list
and are eligible for but not receiving services. Notwithstanding the provisions of section
33.080 to the contrary, any moneys remaining in the fund at the end of the biennium shall not
revert to the credit of the general revenue fund. The state treasurer shall invest moneys in the
fund in the same manner as other funds are invested. Any interest and moneys earned on such
investments shall be credited to the fund. All moneys credited to the trust fund shall be
considered nonstate funds under Section 15, Article IV, Constitution of Missouri. The
treasurer shall distribute all moneys deposited in the fund at times the treasurer deems
appropriate to the department of mental health. The moneys in the developmental disabilities
waiting list equity trust fund established in this subsection shall not be appropriated in lieu of
general state revenues.
3. The director of revenue shall deposit at least monthly all contributions designated
by individuals under this section to the state treasurer for deposit to the fund. The director of
revenue shall deposit at least monthly all contributions designated by the corporations under
this section, less an amount sufficient to cover the costs of collection and handling by the
department of revenue, to the state treasury for deposit to the fund. A contribution designated
under this section shall only be deposited in the fund after all other claims against the refund
from which such contribution is to be made have been satisfied.
4. Under section 23.253 of the Missouri sunset act:
(1) The provisions of the new program authorized under this section shall
automatically sunset on December thirty-first six years after August 28, 2011, unless
reauthorized by an act of the general assembly; and

HCS HB 3428 10
(2) If such program is reauthorized, the program authorized under this section shall
automatically sunset on December thirty-first twelve years after the effective date of the
reauthorization of this section; and
(3) This section shall terminate on September first of the calendar year immediately
following the calendar year in which the program authorized under this section is sunset.
5. On August 28, 2026, any moneys remaining in the developmental disabilities
waiting list equity trust fund created under subsection 2 of this section shall be credited
to the general revenue fund.
143.1026. 1. This section shall be known and may be cited as "Sahara's Law".
2. For all taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2013, each individual or
corporation entitled to a tax refund in an amount sufficient to make a designation under this
section may designate that one dollar or any amount in excess of one dollar on a single return,
and two dollars or any amount in excess of two dollars on a combined return, of the refund
due be credited to the pediatric cancer research trust fund. If any individual or corporation
that is not entitled to a tax refund in an amount sufficient to make a designation under this
section wishes to make a contribution to the fund, such individual or corporation may, by
separate check, draft, or other negotiable instrument, send in with the payment of taxes, or
may send in separately, that amount the individual or corporation wishes to contribute. Such
amounts shall be clearly designated for the fund.
3. There is hereby created in the state treasury the "Pediatric Cancer Research Trust
Fund", which shall consist of money collected under this section. The state treasurer shall be
custodian of the fund. In accordance with sections 30.170 and 30.180, the state treasurer may
approve disbursements. The fund shall be a dedicated fund and, upon appropriation, money
in the fund shall be used solely for the administration of this section. Notwithstanding the
provisions of section 33.080 to the contrary, any moneys remaining in the fund at the end of
the biennium shall not revert to the credit of the general revenue fund. The state treasurer
shall invest moneys in the fund in the same manner as other funds are invested. Any interest
and moneys earned on such investments shall be credited to the fund. All moneys credited to
the trust fund shall be considered state funds under Section 15, Article IV, Constitution of
Missouri, but shall not be included in the calculation of total state revenue under Section 18,
Article X of the Missouri Constitution. The treasurer shall distribute all moneys deposited in
the fund at times the treasurer deems appropriate to CureSearch for Children's Cancer.
4. The director of revenue shall deposit at least monthly all contributions designated
by individuals under this section to the state treasurer for deposit to the fund. The director of
revenue shall deposit at least monthly all contributions designated by the corporations under
this section, less an amount sufficient to cover the costs of collection and handling by the
department of revenue, to the state treasury for deposit to the fund. A contribution designated

HCS HB 3428 11
under this section shall only be deposited in the fund after all other claims against the refund
from which such contribution is to be made have been satisfied.
5. Under section 23.253 of the Missouri sunset act:
(1) The provisions of the new program authorized under this section shall
automatically sunset on December thirty-first five years after August 28, 2019, unless
reauthorized by an act of the general assembly; and
(2) If such program is reauthorized, the program authorized under this section shall
automatically sunset on December thirty-first twelve years after the effective date of the
reauthorization of this section; and
(3) This section shall terminate on September first of the calendar year immediately
following the calendar year in which the program authorized under this section is sunset. The
termination of the program as described in this subsection shall not be construed to preclude
any taxpayer who claims any benefit under any program that is sunset under this subsection
from claiming such benefit for all allowable activities related to such claim that were
completed before the program was sunset, or to eliminate any responsibility of the
administering agency to verify the continued eligibility of projects receiving tax credits and to
enforce other requirements of law that applied before the program was sunset.
6. On August 28, 2026, any moneys remaining in the pediatric cancer research
trust fund created under subsection 3 of this section shall be credited to the general
revenue fund.
143.1027. 1. For all taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2014, each
individual or corporation entitled to a tax refund in an amount sufficient to make a
designation under this section may designate that one dollar or any amount in excess of one
dollar on a single return, and two dollars or any amount in excess of two dollars on a
combined return, of the refund due be credited to the Missouri National Guard Foundation
fund. If any individual or corporation that is not entitled to a tax refund in an amount
sufficient to make a designation under this section wishes to make a contribution to the fund,
such individual or corporation may, by separate check, draft, or other negotiable instrument,
send in with the payment of taxes, or may send in separately, that amount the individual or
corporation wishes to contribute. Such amounts shall be clearly designated for the fund.
2. There is hereby created in the state treasury the "Missouri National Guard
Foundation Fund", which shall consist of money collected under this section. The state
treasurer shall be custodian of the fund. In accordance with sections 30.170 and 30.180, the
state treasurer may approve disbursements. The fund shall be a dedicated fund and, upon
appropriation, money in the fund shall be used solely for the administration of this section.
Notwithstanding the provisions of section 33.080 to the contrary, any moneys remaining in
the fund at the end of the biennium shall not revert to the credit of the general revenue fund.

HCS HB 3428 12
The state treasurer shall invest moneys in the fund in the same manner as other funds are
invested. Any interest and moneys earned on such investments shall be credited to the fund.
The treasurer shall distribute all moneys deposited in the fund at least monthly to the Missouri
National Guard Foundation.
3. The director of revenue shall deposit at least monthly all contributions designated
by individuals under this section to the state treasurer for deposit to the fund. The director of
revenue shall deposit at least monthly all contributions designated by the corporations under
this section, less an amount sufficient to cover the costs of collection and handling by the
department of revenue, to the state treasury for deposit to the fund. A contribution designated
under this section shall only be deposited in the fund after all other claims against the refund
from which such contribution is to be made have been satisfied.
4. Under section 23.253 of the Missouri sunset act:
(1) The provisions of the new program authorized under this section shall
automatically sunset on December thirty-first six years after August 28, 2014, unless
reauthorized by an act of the general assembly; and
(2) If such program is reauthorized, the program authorized under this section shall
automatically sunset on December thirty-first twelve years after the effective date of the
reauthorization of this section; and
(3) This section shall terminate on September first of the calendar year immediately
following the calendar year in which the program authorized under this section is sunset.
5. On August 28, 2026, any moneys remaining in the Missouri National Guard
foundation fund created under subsection 2 of this section shall be credited to the
general revenue fund.
161.1055. 1. Subject to appropriations, the department of elementary and secondary
education shall establish the "Trauma-Informed Schools Pilot Program".
2. Under the trauma-informed schools pilot program, the department of elementary
and secondary education shall choose five schools to receive intensive training on the trauma-
informed approach.
3. The five schools chosen for the pilot program shall be located in the following
areas:
(1) One public school located in a metropolitan school district;
(2) One public school located in a home rule city with more than four hundred
thousand inhabitants and located in more than one county;
(3) One public school located in a school district that has most or all of its land area
located in a county with a charter form of government and with more than nine hundred fifty
thousand inhabitants;

HCS HB 3428 13
(4) One public school located in a school district that has most or all of its land area
located in a county with a charter form of government and with more than six hundred
thousand but fewer than seven hundred thousand inhabitants; and
(5) One public school located in any one of the following counties:
(a) A county of the third classification without a township form of government and
with more than forty-one thousand but fewer than forty-five thousand inhabitants;
(b) A county of the third classification without a township form of government and
with more than six thousand but fewer than seven thousand inhabitants and with a city of the
fourth classification with more than eight hundred but fewer than nine hundred inhabitants as
the county seat;
(c) A county of the third classification with a township form of government and with
more than thirty-one thousand but fewer than thirty-five thousand inhabitants;
(d) A county of the third classification without a township form of government and
with more than fourteen thousand but fewer than sixteen thousand inhabitants and with a city
of the third classification with more than five thousand but fewer than six thousand
inhabitants as the county seat;
(e) A county of the third classification without a township form of government and
with more than eighteen thousand but fewer than twenty thousand inhabitants and with a city
of the fourth classification with more than three thousand but fewer than three thousand seven
hundred inhabitants as the county seat;
(f) A county of the third classification without a township form of government and
with more than eighteen thousand but fewer than twenty thousand inhabitants and with a city
of the third classification with more than six thousand but fewer than seven thousand
inhabitants as the county seat;
(g) A county of the third classification without a township form of government and
with more than fourteen thousand but fewer than sixteen thousand inhabitants and with a city
of the fourth classification with more than one thousand nine hundred but fewer than two
thousand one hundred inhabitants as the county seat;
(h) A county of the third classification without a township form of government and
with more than thirty-seven thousand but fewer than forty-one thousand inhabitants and with
a city of the fourth classification with more than eight hundred but fewer than nine hundred
inhabitants as the county seat;
(i) A county of the third classification with a township form of government and with
more than twenty-eight thousand but fewer than thirty-one thousand inhabitants; or
(j) A county of the third classification without a township form of government and
with more than twelve thousand but fewer than fourteen thousand inhabitants and with a city

HCS HB 3428 14
of the fourth classification with more than five hundred but fewer than five hundred fifty
inhabitants as the county seat.
4. The department of elementary and secondary education shall:
(1) Train the teachers and administrators of the five schools chosen for the pilot
program regarding the trauma-informed approach and how to become trauma-informed
schools;
(2) Provide the five schools with funds to implement the trauma-informed approach;
and
(3) Closely monitor the progress of the five schools in becoming trauma-informed
schools and provide further assistance if necessary.
5. The department of elementary and secondary education shall terminate the trauma-
informed schools pilot program on August 28, 2019. Before December 31, 2019, the
department of elementary and secondary education shall submit a report to the general
assembly that contains the results of the pilot program, including any benefits experienced by
the five schools chosen for the program.
6. (1) There is hereby created in the state treasury the "Trauma-Informed Schools
Pilot Program Fund". The fund shall consist of any appropriations to such fund. The state
treasurer shall be custodian of the fund. In accordance with sections 30.170 and 30.180, the
state treasurer may approve disbursements of public moneys in accordance with distribution
requirements and procedures developed by the department of elementary and secondary
education. The fund shall be a dedicated fund and, upon appropriation, moneys in the fund
shall be used solely for the administration of this section.
(2) Notwithstanding the provisions of section 33.080 to the contrary, any moneys
remaining in the fund at the end of the biennium shall not revert to the credit of the general
revenue fund.
(3) The state treasurer shall invest moneys in the fund in the same manner as other
funds are invested. Any interest and moneys earned on such investments shall be credited to
the fund.
7. For purposes of this section, the following terms mean:
(1) "Trauma-informed approach", an approach that involves understanding and
responding to the symptoms of chronic interpersonal trauma and traumatic stress across the
lifespan;
(2) "Trauma-informed school", a school that:
(a) Realizes the widespread impact of trauma and understands potential paths for
recovery;
(b) Recognizes the signs and symptoms of trauma in students, teachers, and staff;

HCS HB 3428 15
(c) Responds by fully integrating knowledge about trauma into its policies,
procedures, and practices; and
(d) Seeks to actively resist retraumatization.
8. The provisions of this section shall expire December 31, 2019.
9. On August 28, 2026, any moneys remaining in the trauma-informed schools
pilot program fund created under subsection 6 of this section shall be credited to the
general revenue fund.
260.920. 1. There is hereby created within the state treasury a fund to be known as
the "Dry-cleaning Environmental Response Trust Fund". All moneys received from the
environmental response surcharges, fees, gifts, bequests, donations and moneys recovered by
the state pursuant to sections 260.900 to 260.960, except for any moneys paid under an
agreement with the director or as civil damages, or any other money so designated shall be
deposited in the state treasury to the credit of the dry-cleaning environmental response trust
fund, and shall be invested to generate income to the fund. Notwithstanding the provisions of
section 33.080, the unexpended balance in the dry-cleaning environmental response trust fund
at the end of each fiscal year shall not be transferred to the general revenue fund.
2. Moneys in the fund may be expended for only the following purposes and for no
other governmental purpose:
(1) The direct costs of administration and enforcement of sections 260.900 to
260.960; and
(2) The costs of corrective action as provided in section 260.925.
3. The state treasurer is authorized to deposit all of the moneys in the dry-cleaning
environmental response trust fund in any of the qualified depositories of the state. All such
deposits shall be secured in such a manner and shall be made upon such terms and conditions
as are now or may hereafter be provided by law relative to state deposits. Interest received on
such deposits shall be credited to the dry-cleaning environmental response trust fund.
4. Any funds received pursuant to sections 260.900 to 260.960 and deposited in the
dry-cleaning environmental response trust fund shall not be considered a part of "total state
revenue" as provided in Sections 17 and 18 of Article X of the Missouri Constitution.
5. On August 28, 2026, any moneys remaining in the dry-cleaning environmental
response trust fund created under subsection 1 of this section shall be credited to the
general revenue fund.
303.406. 1. The "Motorist Insurance Identification Database" is hereby created for
the purpose of establishing a database to use to verify compliance with the motor vehicle
financial responsibility requirements of this chapter. The program shall be administered by
the department and shall receive funding from the "Motorist Insurance Identification
Database Fund", which is hereby created in the state treasury. Effective July 1, 2002, the state

HCS HB 3428 16
treasurer shall credit to and deposit in the motorist insurance identification database fund six
percent of the net general revenue portion received from collections of the insurance
premiums tax levied and collected pursuant to sections 148.310 to 148.461.
2. To implement the program, the department may by July 1, 2002, contract with a
designated agent which shall monitor compliance with the motor vehicle financial
responsibility requirements of this chapter, except that the program shall not be
implemented to notify owners of registered motor vehicles until the department certifies
that the accuracy rate of the program exceeds ninety-five percent in correctly identifying
owners of registered motor vehicles as having maintained or failed to maintain financial
responsibility. After the department has entered into a contract with a designated agent, the
department shall convene a working group for the purpose of facilitating the implementation
of the program.
3. The designated agent, using its own computer network, shall, no later than
December 31, 2002, develop, deliver and maintain a computer database with information
provided by:
(1) Insurers, pursuant to sections 303.400 to 303.415; except that, any person who
qualifies as self-insured pursuant to this chapter, or provides proof of insurance to the director
pursuant to the provisions of section 303.160, shall not be required to provide information to
the designated agent, but the state shall supply these records to the designated agent for
inclusion in the database; and
(2) The department, which shall provide the designated agent with the name, date of
birth and address of all persons in its computer database, and the make, year and vehicle
identification number of all registered motor vehicles.
4. The department shall establish guidelines for the designated agent's development of
the computer database so the database can be easily accessed by state and local law
enforcement agencies within procedures already established, and shall not require additional
computer keystrokes or other additional procedures by dispatch or law enforcement
personnel. Once the database is operational, the designated agent shall, at least monthly,
update the database with information provided by insurers and the department, and compare
then-current motor vehicle registrations against the database.
5. Information provided to the designated agent by insurers and the department for
inclusion in the database established pursuant to this section is the property of the insurer or
the department, as the case may be, and is not subject to disclosure pursuant to chapter 610.
Such information may not be disclosed except as follows:
(1) The designated agent shall verify a person's insurance coverage upon request by
any state or local government agency investigating, litigating or enforcing such person's
compliance with the motor vehicle financial responsibility requirements of this chapter;

HCS HB 3428 17
(2) The department shall disclose whether an individual is maintaining the required
insurance coverage upon request of the following individuals and agencies only:
(a) The individual;
(b) The parent or legal guardian of an individual if the individual is an unemancipated
minor;
(c) The legal guardian of the individual if the individual is legally incapacitated;
(d) Any person who has power of attorney from the individual;
(e) Any person who submits a notarized release from the individual that is dated no
more than ninety days before the request is made;
(f) Any person claiming loss or injury in a motor vehicle accident in which the
individual is involved;
(g) The office of the state auditor, for the purpose of conducting any audit authorized
by law.
6. Any person or agency who knowingly discloses information from the database for
any purpose, or to a person, other than those authorized in this section is guilty of a class A
misdemeanor. The state shall not be liable to any person for gathering, managing or using
information in the database pursuant to this section. The designated agent shall not be liable
to any person for performing its duties pursuant to this section unless and to the extent such
agent commits a willful and wanton act or omission or is negligent. The designated agent
shall be liable to any insurer damaged by the designated agent's negligent failure to protect the
confidentiality of the information and data disclosed by the insurer to the designated agent.
The designated agent shall provide to this state an errors and omissions insurance policy
covering such agent in an appropriate amount. No insurer shall be liable to any person for
performing its duties pursuant to this section unless and to the extent the insurer commits a
willful and wanton act of omission.
7. The department shall review the operation and performance of the motorist
insurance identification database program to determine whether the number of uninsured
motorists has declined during the first three years following implementation and shall submit
a report of its findings to the general assembly no later than January fifteenth of the year
following the third complete year of implementation. The department shall make copies of its
report available to each member of the general assembly.
8. This section shall not supersede other actions or penalties that may be taken or
imposed for violation of the motor vehicle financial responsibility requirements of this
chapter.
9. The working group as provided for in subsection 2 of this section shall consist of
representatives from the insurance industry, department of commerce and insurance,
department of public safety and the department of revenue. The director of revenue, after

HCS HB 3428 18
consultation with the working group, shall promulgate any rules and regulations necessary to
administer and enforce this section. No rule or portion of a rule promulgated pursuant to the
authority of this section shall become effective unless it has been promulgated pursuant to the
provisions of chapter 536.
10. On August 28, 2026, any moneys remaining in the motorist insurance
identification database fund created under subsection 1 of this section shall be credited
to the general revenue fund.
620.2100. 1. There is hereby established the "Ozark Exploration Bicentennial
Commission".
2. The commission shall consist of the following members:
(1) Two representatives appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives;
(2) Two senators appointed by the president pro tempore of the senate;
(3) One faculty member of Missouri State University appointed by university
leadership;
(4) The director of the division of tourism or his or her designee;
(5) Two members representing historical societies within the area of exploration, one
appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives and one appointed by the president
pro tempore of the senate;
(6) Two members of the public appointed by the speaker of the house of
representatives; and
(7) Two members of the public appointed by the president pro tempore of the senate.
3. Members of the commission shall be appointed by October 1, 2017.
4. Members of the commission shall serve without compensation. The division of
tourism shall provide administrative support for the commission.
5. There is hereby established in the state treasury the "Ozark Exploration
Bicentennial Fund" to be held separate and apart from all other public moneys and funds of
the state. The fund may accept state and federal appropriations, grants, bequests, gifts, fees,
and awards to be held for use by the Ozark exploration bicentennial commission.
Notwithstanding the provisions of section 33.080 to the contrary, moneys remaining in the
fund at the end of any biennium shall not revert to general revenue. The state treasurer shall
be custodian of the fund. In accordance with sections 30.170 and 30.180, the state treasurer
may approve disbursements. The state treasurer shall invest moneys in the fund in the same
manner as other funds are invested. Any interest and moneys earned on such investments
shall be credited to the fund.
6. The duties of the commission shall include, but not be limited to:
(1) Organizing and coordinating efforts relating to the bicentennial celebration of the
exploration of the Ozarks in 1819; and

HCS HB 3428 19
(2) Promoting public awareness of the importance and cultural significance of the
exploration to Missouri history.
7. The commission shall be dissolved and the provisions of this section shall expire
on June 30, 2019.
8. On August 28, 2026, any moneys remaining in the Ozark exploration
bicentennial fund created under subsection 5 of this section shall be credited to the
general revenue fund.
650.550. 1. There is hereby created in the state treasury the "Economic Distress Zone
Fund", which shall consist of money appropriated under this section. The state treasurer shall
be custodian of the fund. In accordance with sections 30.170 and 30.180, the state treasurer
may approve disbursements. The fund shall be a dedicated fund and money in the fund shall
be used solely by the department of public safety to provide funding to organizations
registered with the United States Internal Revenue Service as a 501(c)(3) corporation that
provide services to residents of the state in areas of high incidents of crime and deteriorating
infrastructure in for the purpose of deterring criminal behavior in such areas. Any moneys
appropriated and any other moneys made available by gift, grant, bequest, contribution, or
otherwise to carry out the purpose of this section, and all interest earned on, and income
generated from, moneys in the fund shall be paid to, and deposited in, the economic distress
zone fund.
2. Notwithstanding the provisions of section 33.080 to the contrary, any moneys
appropriated to the fund over three million dollars, excluding any moneys made available by
gift, grant, bequest, contribution, or otherwise, that remain in the fund at the end of the
biennium shall revert to the credit of the general revenue fund.
3. The department of public safety shall promulgate rules to carry out the provisions
of this section. Any rule or portion of a rule, as that term is defined in section 536.010, that is
created under the authority delegated in this section shall become effective only if it complies
with and is subject to all of the provisions of chapter 536 and, if applicable, section 536.028.
This section and chapter 536 are nonseverable and if any of the powers vested with the
general assembly pursuant to chapter 536 to review, to delay the effective date, or to
disapprove and annul a rule are subsequently held unconstitutional, then the grant of
rulemaking authority and any rule proposed or adopted after August 28, 2021, shall be invalid
and void.
4. As used in this section, "areas of high incidents of crime and deteriorating
infrastructure" shall mean a city with a homicide rate of at least seven times the national
average according to the Federal Bureau of Investigation's Uniform Crime Reporting System;
a poverty rate that exceeds twenty percent according to the United States Census Bureau; and

HCS HB 3428 20
has a school district with at least eighty percent of students who qualify for free or reduced
lunch.
5. The provisions of this section shall terminate on August 28, 2024.
6. On August 28, 2026, any moneys remaining in the economic distress zone fund
created under subsection 1 of this section shall be credited to the general revenue fund.
✔